Hawaii statutes.
[PART VI.
SELF-INSURER REQUIREMENTS]

[§431:10C-601] Agreement. The
applicant shall execute and file with the commissioner an agreement in a form
prescribed by the commissioner, that if certified as a self-insurer the
applicant shall:

(1) Permit the commissioner or an authorized
representative to inspect and copy records and provide them copies of records
pertaining to the self-insurer's financial condition, processing and payment of
claims, and any other matters pertinent to the administration and enforcement
of this article; and

(2) Provide all mandatory benefits required under
this article and comply with all requirements of articles 10C and 13, and with
the rules and directives of the commissioner, including, but not limited to,
those relating to processing and payment of assessments and fees. [L 2000, c
24, pt of §3]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next